Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6331
Violations; disciplinary actions; civil penalty; procedure; appeal; lien; enforcement.

(1) An application or a license under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal, suspended, or revoked if the applicant or licensee violates any of the provisions of the act, fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license, fails at any time to meet the qualifications for a license, fails to comply with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, fails to meet any applicable state standard for abatement projects, or employs or permits an unlicensed individual to work in a lead-based paint profession. An individual shall be subject to the reporting, investigatory, and disciplinary provisions of sections 38-176 to 38-185, 38-1,106, 38-1,109 to 38-1,126, and 38-1,137 to 38-1,139 for any of the grounds for disciplinary action found in the Uniform Credentialing Act and for any violation of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the acts.

(2) In addition to the disciplinary actions provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the department may assess a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than three thousand dollars for each offense committed by any firm licensed under the act for violation of the act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

(3) Whenever the department determines to deny, refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke a firm license or assess a civil penalty on a firm, it shall send to the applicant or licensee a notice setting forth the particular reasons for the determination. The denial, suspension, refusal to renew, revocation, or assessment of a civil penalty shall become final thirty days after the mailing of the notice unless the applicant or licensee gives written notice to the department of a desire for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the applicant or licensee shall be given a hearing before the department and shall have the right to present such evidence as may be proper. On the basis of such evidence, the determination shall be affirmed, modified, or set aside, and a copy of such decision setting forth the findings of fact and the particular reasons upon which such decision was based shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant or licensee. The decision shall become a final decision of the department and may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(4) Hearings held pursuant to this section shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(5) Any civil penalty assessed and unpaid under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property. The department shall, within thirty days of receipt, remit any collected civil penalty to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 179;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 52;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1283.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.